Nebraska, session 109, LB59.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 2-3224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-3224 (1) Funds of the district shall be paid out or expended only upon
the authorization or approval of the board of directors and by:
(a) Check check, draft, warrant, or other instrument in writing, signed by
the treasurer, assistant treasurer, or such other officer, employee, or agent
of the district as shall be authorized by the treasurer to sign on in his
behalf of the treasurer; or
(b) Electronic payment system including an electronic funds transfer and
automated clearinghouse transfer.
(2) The Provided, such authorization of the treasurer for another to sign
on behalf of the treasurer shall be in writing and filed with the secretary of
the district.
(3) In ; and provided further, in the event that the treasurer's bond
shall not expressly insure the district against loss resulting from the
fraudulent, illegal, negligent, or otherwise wrongful or unauthorized acts or
conduct by or on the part of any and every person thus authorized to sign on
behalf of the treasurer, there shall be procured and filed with the secretary
of the district, together with the authorization of the treasurer, a corporate
surety bond, effective for protection against such loss, in such form and
amount and with such corporate surety as shall be approved in writing by the
signed endorsement thereon of any two officers of the district other than the
treasurer.
(4) The secretary shall report to the board at each meeting any such bonds
filed, or any change in the status of any such bonds, since the last previous
meeting of the board.
Sec. 2. Original section 2-3224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-